Utah statutes.
57-9-9.   Legislative purpose and construction.

This act shall be liberally construed to effect the legislative purpose of simplifying and facilitating land title transactions by allowing persons to rely on a record chain of title as described in Section 57-9-1 of this act, subject only to such limitations as appear in Section 57-9-2 of this act.

